es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Seguridad y protección para vehículos > Equipo de protección para motocicletas: Protectores de pecho y espalda para motocicleta; Coderas y muñequeras para motocicleta; Guantes para motocicletas; Gafas para motocicletas; Guardamanos para motocicletas; Accesorios y piezas para cascos de motocicleta; Cascos para motocicletas; Fajas para motocicletas; Rodilleras y espinilleras para motocicleta; Protector de cuello para motocicleta
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ασφάλεια & προστασία οχημάτων > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός μοτοσυκλέτας: Προστατευτικά θώρακα & πλάτης μοτοσυκλέτας; Προστατευτικά αγκώνων & καρπών μοτοσυκλέτας; Γάντια μοτοσικλέτας; Γυαλιά μοτοσικλέτας; Προστατευτικά χεριών μοτοσικλέτας; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ κράνους μοτοσικλέτας; Κράνη μοτοσυκλέτας; Ζώνες νεφρών μοτοσυκλέτας; Προστατευτικά γονάτων & κνημών μοτοσικλέτας; Αυχενικές προστατευτικές ζώνες μοτοσικλέτας
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Zabezpieczenia pojazdów > Ochraniacze motocyklowe: Ochraniacze motocyklowe klatki piersiowej i pleców; Ochraniacze motocyklowe nadgarstków i łokci; Rękawice motocyklowe; Gogle motocyklowe; Osłony rąk do motocykli; Części i akcesoria do kasków motocyklowych; Kaski motocyklowe; Pasy nerkowe; Ochraniacze motocyklowe kolan i piszczeli; Motocyklowe stabilizatory szyi
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛安全 > 重機護具: 騎士胸背式護具; 騎士護肘護腕; 騎士手套; 機車護目鏡; 機車把手護弓; 摩托車安全帽零件/配件; 摩托車安全帽; 騎士護腰; 騎士護膝脛; 騎士護頸防具
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Bezpečnosť a zabezpečenie vozidla > Chrániče pre motocykle: Motocyklistické chrániče hrudníka a chrbta; Motocyklistické chrániče lakťov a zápästia; Motocyklistické rukavice; Motocyklistické okuliare; Motocyklistické chrániče rúk; Diely a príslušenstvo pre motocyklistické prilby; Motocyklistické prilby; Motocyklistické bedrové pásy; Motocyklistické chrániče kolien a holení; Motocyklistické nákrčníky
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Segurança de veículos > Equipamentos de proteção para motociclistas: Protetores peitorais de motocicleta; Cotoveleiras e protetores de pulso para motocicleta; Luvas de motocicleta; Óculos de proteção para motociclista; Protetor de mãos para motocicleta; Peças e acessórios para capacetes de motocicleta; Capacetes para motociclistas; Protetores abdominais de motocicleta; Joelheiras e caneleiras para motocicleta; Protetores de pescoço para motocicleta
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > An toàn và an ninh xe cộ > Đồ bảo hộ khi đi mô tô: Phụ kiện bảo hộ mô tô phần ngực và lưng; Ốp bảo hộ mô tô phần khuỷu và cổ tay; Găng tay đi mô tô; Kính đi xe máy; Bảo vệ tay xe máy; Phụ tùng và phụ kiện mũ bảo hiểm; Mũ bảo hiểm mô tô; Tấm đai bảo hộ mô tô vùng bụng; Ốp bảo hộ mô tô phần ống chân và đầu gối; Đai bảo hộ mô tô vùng cổ
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Sécurité des véhicules > Equipements de protection moto: Protections torse et dos pour motards; Protège-coudes et protège-poignets pour motards; Gants de moto; Lunettes de moto; Protège-mains pour moto; Pièces détachées et accessoires pour casques de moto; Casques de moto; Ceintures protège-reins pour motards; Genouillères et protège-tibias pour motards; Tours de cou pour motards
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműbiztonság és -védelem > Motorkerékpár-védőfelszerelés: Motorkerékpáros mellkas- és hátvédők; Motorkerékpáros könyök- és csuklóvédők; Motorkerékpár-kesztyűk; Motorkerékpár-szemüvegek; Motorkerékpár-kézvédők; Motorkerékpársisak-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Motorkerékpár-sisakok; Motorkerékpáros veseövek; Motorkerékpáros térd- és lábszárvédők; Motorkerékpáros nyakmerevítők
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøysikkerhet > Beskyttelsesutstyr for motorsykkel: Bryst- og ryggbeskyttere for motorsykkel; Albue- og håndleddbeskyttere for motorsykkel; Motorsykkelhansker; Motorsykkelbriller; Håndbeskyttere for motorsykkel; Deler og tilbehør til motorsykkelhjelmer; Motorsykkelhjelmer; Nyrebelter for motorsykkel; Kne- og leggbeskyttere for motorsykkel; Nakkebeskyttere for motorsykkel
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių sauga ir apsauga > Apsaugos priemonės motociklininkams: Krūtinės ir nugaros apsaugos motociklininkams; Alkūnių ir riešų apsaugos motociklininkams; Motociklininkų pirštinės; Motociklininkų akiniai; Motociklininkų rankų apsaugos; Motociklininkų šalmų dalys ir priedai; Motociklininkų šalmai; Juosmens apsaugos diržai motociklininkams; Kelių ir blauzdų apsaugos motociklininkams; Kaklo apsaugos motociklininkams
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ความปลอดภัยและการรักษาความปลอดภัยรถยนต์ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับจักรยานยนต์: อุปกรณ์ป้องกันหน้าอกและหลังสำหรับขับขี่มอเตอร์ไซต์; ที่ป้องกันข้อศอกและข้อมือสำหรับขับขี่มอเตอร์ไซต์; ถุงมือสำหรับจักรยานยนต์; แว่นสำหรับจักรยานยนต์; ล็อกแฮนด์มอเตอร์ไซค์; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์หมวกกันน็อคสำหรับขับขี่มอเตอร์ไซต์; หมวกกันน็อกสำหรับจักรยานยนต์; เข็มขัดป้องกันอวัยวะภายในสำหรับขับขี่มอเตอร์ไซต์; ที่ป้องกันหัวเข่าและคางสำหรับขับขี่มอเตอร์ไซต์; อุปกรณ์เสริมคอสำหรับขับขี่มอเตอร์ไซต์
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Güvenliği ve Emniyeti > Motosiklet Koruyucu Ekipmanları: Motosiklet Göğüs ve Sırt Koruyucuları; Motosiklet Dirsek ve Bilek Koruyucuları; Motosiklet Eldivenleri; Motosiklet Gözlükleri; Motosiklet El Koruyucuları; Motosiklet Kask Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Motosiklet Kaskları; Motosiklet Bel Koruyucu Kemerleri; Motosiklet Diz ve İncik Kemiği Koruyucuları; Motosiklet Boyun Koruyucuları
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Safety & Security > Motorcycle Protective Gear: Motorcycle Chest & Back Protectors; Motorcycle Elbow & Wrist Guards; Motorcycle Gloves; Motorcycle Goggles; Motorcycle Hand Guards; Motorcycle Helmet Parts & Accessories; Motorcycle Helmets; Motorcycle Kidney Belts; Motorcycle Knee & Shin Guards; Motorcycle Neck Braces
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Siguranța și securitatea vehiculelor > Echipament de protecție pentru motociclete: Protecții pentru piept și spate pentru motociclete; Cotiere și protecții încheieturi motociclete; Mănuși de motociclete; Ochelari de motociclete; Protecții mâini pentru motociclete; Piese și accesorii pentru căști de motocicletă; Căști de motocicletă; Centuri de protecție pentru rinichi pentru motociclete; Protecții pentru genunchi și tibie pentru motociclete; Protecții pentru gât pentru motociclete
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 안전/보안 > 오토바이 보호 장비: 오토바이 가슴/등 보호대; 오토바이 팔꿈치/손목 가드; 오토바이 장갑; 오토바이 고글; 오토바이 핸드가드; 오토바이 헬멧 부품/부대용품; 오토바이 헬멧; 오토바이 허리 보호대; 오토바이 무릎/정강이 가드; 오토바이 목 보호대
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Безопасност и сигурност на превозни средства > Защитна екипировка за мотоциклети: Протектори за гърди и гръб за мотоциклет; Предпазители за лакти и китки за мотоциклет; Ръкавици за мотоциклет; Очила за мотоциклет; Предпазители за ръце на мотоциклети; Части и аксесоари за каски за мотоциклет; Каски за мотоциклет; Защитни колани за бъбреци за мотоциклет; Протектори за колена и пищял за мотоциклет; Протектори за врат за мотоциклет
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Fahrzeugsicherheit > Motorrad-Schutzausrüstung: Motorrad: Brust- und Rückenprotektoren; Motorrad: Ellbogen- und Handgelenkschützer; Motorradhandschuhe; Motorradbrillen; Motorrad-Handprotektoren; Motorradhelmersatzteile & -zubehör; Motorradhelme; Motorrad-Nierengurte; Motorrad: Knie- & Schienbeinschützer; Motorrad-Genickschutz
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Segurança e proteção para veículos > Equipamento de proteção para motas: Protetores de peito e costas para motas; Proteções de pulso e cotovelo para motas; Luvas para motas; Óculos para motas; Proteções de mãos para motas; Acessórios e peças de capacetes para motas; Capacetes para motas; Cintas abdominais para motas; Proteções de canela e joelho para motas; Proteções de pescoço para motas
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Køretøjssikkerhed > Beskyttelsesudstyr til motorcykler: Bryst- og rygbeskyttere til motorcykler; Albue- og håndledsbeskyttere til motorcykler; Motorcykelhandsker; Motorcykelbriller; Håndbeskyttere til motorcykler; Dele og tilbehør til motorcykelhjelme; Motorcykelhjelme; Nyrebælter til motorcykler; Knæ- og skinnebensbeskyttere til motorcykler; Nakkestøtter til motorcykler
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка и товары для обеспечения безопасности транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка для мотоциклистов: Защита груди и спины для мотоциклистов; Налокотники и защита запястий для мотоциклистов; Мотоциклетные перчатки; Мотоциклетные очки; Защита кисти для мотоциклистов; Детали и аксессуары для мотоциклетных шлемов; Мотоциклетные шлемы; Защитные пояса для мотоциклистов; Наколенники и щитки для голени для мотоциклистов; Защита шеи для мотоциклистов
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Sigurnost i zaštita vozila > Zaštitna oprema za motocikle: Štitnici za prsa i leđa za motocikl; Štitnici za laktove i zglobove za motocikl; Motociklističke rukavice; Motociklističke naočale; Štitnici za ruke motocikla; Dijelovi i dodaci za motociklističke kacige; Motociklističke kacige; Remeni za bubrege za motocikl; Štitnici za koljena i potkoljenice za motocikl; Naramenice za vrat za motocikl
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 车辆安全防盗用品 > 摩托车护具: 摩托车胸/背护具; 摩托车护肘/护腕; 摩托车手套; 摩托护目镜; 摩托车护手; 摩托车头盔零件/配件; 摩托车头盔; 摩托车护腰带; 摩托车护膝/护胫; 摩托车护颈
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物の安全・防犯関連用品 > バイク用安全装備: バイク用プロテクター（胸部・脊椎）; バイク用プロテクター（肘・手首）; バイク用グローブ; バイク用ゴーグル; バイク用ナックルガード; バイク用ヘルメットパーツ・関連用品; バイク用ヘルメット; バイク用キドニーベルト; バイク用プロテクター（膝・脛）; バイク用ネックブレース
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Sicurezza e protezioni per veicoli > Abbigliamento protettivo da moto: Paraschiena e paracostole per moto; Gomitiere e polsiere per moto; Guanti da moto; Occhiali da moto; Protezioni per le mani per moto; Accessori per caschi per moto; Caschi da moto; Cintura lombare per moto; Ginocchiere e parastinchi per moto; Bretelle per moto
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon turvallisuus > Suojavarusteet moottoripyöräilyyn: Selkä- ja rintapanssarit moottoripyöräilyyn; Kyynärpää- ja rannesuojat moottoripyöräilyyn; Moottoripyöräilyhanskat; Suojalasit moottoripyöräilyyn; Käsisuojat moottoripyöräilyyn; Moottoripyöräilykypärän osat ja lisätarvikkeet; Moottoripyöräkypärät; Munuaisvyöt moottoripyöräilyyn; Moottoripyörän polvi- ja säärisuojat; Niskasuojat moottoripyöräilyyn
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Veiligheid en bescherming voor voertuigen > Beschermende motoruitrusting: Borst- en rugbeschermers voor motorrijders; Elleboog- en polsbeschermers voor motorrijders; Motorhandschoenen; Motorbrillen; Handbeschermers voor motorrijders; Onderdelen en accessoires voor motorhelmen; Motorhelmen; Nierriemen voor motorrijders; Knie- en scheenbeschermers voor motorrijders; Neksteunen voor motorrijders
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Bezpečnost a zabezpečení vozidel > Motocyklové ochranné pomůcky: Motocyklové chrániče hrudi a páteře; Motocyklové chrániče loktů a zápěstí; Motocyklové rukavice; Motocyklové brýle; Chrániče rukou pro motocykly; Díly a příslušenství k motocyklovým helmám; Motocyklové helmy; Motocyklové ledvinové pásy; Motocyklové chrániče kolen a holení; Motocyklové chrániče krku
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonssäkerhet > Skyddsutrustning för motorcykel: Bröst- och ryggskydd för motorcykel; Armbågs- och handledsskydd för motorcykel; Motorcykelhandskar; Motorcykelglasögon; Handskydd för motorcyklar; Delar och tillbehör till motorcykelhjälmar; Motorcykelhjälmar; Njurskydd för motorcykel; Knä- och benskydd för motorcykel; Nackskydd för motorcykel
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Varnost in zaščita vozil > Zaščitna oprema za motorna kolesa: Ščitniki za prsni koš in hrbet za motorna kolesa; Ščitniki za komolce in zapestja za motorna kolesa; Motoristične rokavice; Motoristična očala; Motoristični ščitniki za roke; Deli in dodatki za motoristične čelade; Motoristične čelade; Motoristični ledvični pasovi; Motoristični ščitniki za kolena in goleni; Motociklistične opornice za vrat